Missouri, session 2026, SB1704.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 135.790, to read as
follows:
135.790. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Animal", a living domesticated vertebrate other
than a human being, not including farm animals as defined
under section 578.005;
(2) "Animal shelter", the same meaning given to such
term under section 273.325;
(3) "Qualified amount", for any qualified pet
adoption, the total amount of moneys paid by a taxpayer to
an animal shelter for such qualified pet adoption, including
any adoption fees and other associated medical and
administrative costs, up to one hundred twenty-five dollars;
(4) "Qualified pet adoption", any adoption by a
taxpayer of an animal from an animal shelter for the purpose
of keeping such animal as a pet;

SB 1704 2
(5) "Tax credit", a credit against the individual
income tax otherwise due under chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(6) "Taxpayer", any individual subject to the state
income tax imposed under chapter 143.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027, a taxpayer shall be allowed to claim a tax credit
against the taxpayer's state tax liability for a qualified
pet adoption made by the taxpayer during the tax year. The
amount of any tax credit claimed for a qualified pet
adoption shall be equal to the qualified amount for such
qualified pet adoption.
3. A taxpayer shall not be allowed to claim more than
two tax credits under this section per tax year, regardless
of whether the taxpayer makes more than two qualified pet
adoptions during the tax year.
4. The animal shelter shall provide a receipt to the
taxpayer upon adoption, a copy of which the taxpayer shall
submit with the claim for tax credits under this section on
a form and in such manner as the department may establish by
rule.
5. The cumulative amount of tax credits allowed to all
taxpayers under this section shall not exceed five hundred
thousand dollars per calendar year. If the amount of tax
credits claimed in a calendar year under this section
exceeds five hundred thousand dollars, tax credits shall be
allowed based on the order in which they are claimed.
6. Tax credits issued under the provisions of this
section shall be refundable. No tax credit claimed under
this section shall be assigned, transferred, sold, or
otherwise conveyed. No tax credit claimed under this
section shall be carried forward to any subsequent tax year.

SB 1704 3
7. (1) A taxpayer shall forfeit any tax credits
issued to such taxpayer that have not been redeemed, or
shall repay the amount of any tax credits redeemed by such
taxpayer in the event the adopted animal is returned,
abused, released, sold, killed, fed to a pet carnivore, or
otherwise not cared for by the taxpayer, except in cases of
humane killing as defined under section 578.005, but not
including the part of that definition that considers animals
killed during the feeding of pet carnivores to be humanely
killed.
(2) The department may verify the adoption status with
the animal shelter and citations or other records of abuse
or neglect of the adopted animal with the local animal
control or other applicable authorities and may request any
other information or documentation from the taxpayer as
necessary to verify the good faith adoption and wellbeing of
the adopted animal at the time of the credit application.
8. Notwithstanding any provision of section 105.1500
to the contrary, any requirement to provide information,
documents, or records under this section, and any
requirement established by the department of revenue to
provide information, documents, or records for the purpose
of administering and enforcing this section, shall be exempt
from the provisions of section 105.1500.
9. The department of revenue shall promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations to administer the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and

SB 1704 4
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of this section shall sunset six
years after the effective date of this section unless
reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the provisions of this section are sunset; and
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a
taxpayer from claiming a tax credit properly issued before
this program was sunset in a tax year after the program is
sunset.
✓